Idaho, session 2025, S1011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-123, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-123. WINTER FEEDING ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (1) A winter feeding ad-
visory committee shall be established for each district where winter feed-
ing of antelope, elk, and deer normally occurs. Each committee shall con-
sist of five (5) members, each of which shall be a resident of the district
for which the committee is formed. The members shall be appointed and re-
moved for cause by unanimous vote of the Idaho fish and game commission. It
is intended that the committees reflect the cross section of the major inter-
est groups associated with each district. As vacant committee positions are
filled after July 1, 2025, at least one (1) member of each committee shall be
an agricultural producer. Each committee shall meet at such times as appro-
priate, but not less frequently than annually, on or before December 1, be-
fore the winter feeding season arrives, whichever is earlier.
(2) The term of office of a member shall be two (2) years, except a por-
tion of the initial appointments may be for a term of one (1) year to provide
staggered terms. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the balance of
the unexpired term. The committees shall serve without compensation.
(3) Each winter feeding advisory committee established pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section shall appoint a chairman. The chairmen of the
committees shall meet at least annually to coordinate activities and promote
consensus on issues of common interest among the winter feeding advisory
committees. The chairmen may elect a leader from among the chairmen to call
meetings and conduct and coordinate activities of the group.
(4) The department of fish and game shall provide staff assistance and
support for the committees.
(5) The committees shall have the authority to:
(a) Act as an independent resource in each district to give advice and
recommendations on the administration of winter feeding programs;
(b) Act as a liaison between the commission, the department, interest
groups, and the public on winter feeding issues.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.